Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-2219
Merger or consolidation.

A professional corporation organized under the provisions of the Nebraska Professional Corporation Act may consolidate or merge with another domestic professional corporation organized under the act to render the same professional service or a foreign professional corporation admitted or which would qualify to be admitted under the act to render the same professional service in this state.

Laws 1969, c. 121, § 19, p. 561;

Laws 1994, LB 488, § 3.